Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 36.
POLL TAX EXEMPTION.

Members of the armed forces of United States.

Any citizen of Arkansas, while serving in the armed forces of the United States, may vote in any election, without having paid a poll tax, if otherwise qualified to vote in any such election.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiated petition and adopted at the general election on Nov. 7, 1944, by a vote of 151,564 for and 38,964 against. See Acts 1945, p. 774.